District of Columbia statutes.
1-737

Retention of records.

The Board shall maintain records on the matters required to be disclosed by this chapter which will provide in sufficient detail the necessary basic information and data from which the required documents may be verified, explained, or clarified, and checked for accuracy and completeness, shall include vouchers, worksheets, receipts, and applicable resolutions in such records, and shall keep such records available for examination for a period of not less than 6 years after the filing date of the documents based on the information which they contain. Except to the extent that information is involved which is protected from public disclosure under § 1-736(b), all such records shall be available for inspection by the public.

Nov. 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 866, Pub. L. 96-122, § 167
1981 Ed., § 1-737.
1973 Ed., § 1-1837.